Louisiana, session 2026, HB1070.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 887(F)(1) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 887. Defendant's liability for costs; suspension of costs; no advance costs
* * *
F.(1)(a) In addition to the costs provided in Paragraphs A, C, D, and E G,
and H of this Article, a person convicted of a felony, a misdemeanor, or ordinance
of any local government, including a traffic felony, a traffic misdemeanor, or a local
traffic violation, shall be assessed an additional three dollars as a special court cost,
provided that such additional cost shall be one dollar in mayor's courts in
municipalities with a population of two thousand or less. one hundred or less in the
most recent federal decennial census. Such special costs shall be imposed by all
courts, including mayor's courts and magistrate courts, shall not be suspended, and
shall be used for implementation of the master plan for the development of a trial
court case management information system and for the fast-tracked prototype
development of the criminal disposition component thereof of the system in order
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1070 ENROLLED
to define and meet the needs of clerks of court, trial court judges, law enforcement
and corrections officials, the supreme court, the legislature, and the general public,
for coordination with and implementation of related technology projects as provided
for pursuant to the authority of R.S. 39:100.211, and for the implementation of an
integrated juvenile justice information system for use in all courts exercising juvenile
court jurisdiction. The proceeds of the special cost shall be deposited in the state
treasury monthly on or before the tenth day of each calendar month.
(b) After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana, relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and prior to monies being placed in the state general fund, an amount equal to that
deposited in the state treasury, as required above in this Paragraph, shall be credited
to the special fund hereby created in the state treasury to be known as the Trial Court
Case Management Information Fund. The disbursement of the proceeds from the
fund shall be made on the warrant of the judicial administrator of the supreme court
drawn on the state treasury. The monies in this fund shall be used solely for the
purposes identified in this Paragraph, including necessary and associated
administrative expenses. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in this fund at
the end of the fiscal year shall remain in such this fund. All monies in this fund shall
be invested by the state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the general fund
with interest earned on the investment of these monies credited to this fund following
compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B), relative to the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund.
(c) The administrator of the Trial Court Case Management Information Fund
shall coordinate and cooperate with the Integrated Criminal Justice Information
System Policy Board to improve case management data-related systems. The
administrator may also coordinate and cooperate with the legislative auditor or
otherwise contract to investigate compliance with the obligations to remit costs
pursuant to this Paragraph. The trial court shall not waive, set aside, or redirect such
costs for any other purpose.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1070 ENROLLED
(d) The amounts authorized in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph may be
modified to account for inflation by considering the change, if any, in the Consumer
Price Index (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics, or its successor, since it was originally enacted; provided that any
modifications approved shall be made only in whole increments of fifty cents, any
subsequent adjustments shall be approved and calculated in the same manner by
measuring the inflation increase, if any, from the date of the immediately preceding
adjustment, and the total amount of adjustment pursuant to this Subparagraph shall
not exceed four dollars. Any modification pursuant to this Subparagraph shall be
implemented by the supreme court only after approval following a favorable
recommendation by the Judicial Council that it meets all applicable Judicial Council
guidelines.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.